Utah statutes.
41-6a-202.   Violations of chapter -- Penalties.

(1)  A violation of any provision of this chapter is a class C misdemeanor, unless otherwise provided.

(2)  A violation of any provision of Parts 2, 11, 17, and 18 of this chapter is an infraction, unless otherwise provided.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 2, 2005 General Session

